Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-624 Waiver. (a) A debtor or
secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of
collateral under section 490:9-611 only by an agreement to that effect entered
into and authenticated after default.

(b) A debtor may waive the right to require
disposition of collateral under section 490:9-620(e) only by an agreement to
that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

(c) Except in a consumer-goods transaction, a
debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under
section 490:9-623 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and
authenticated after default. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next